Massachusetts, session 194th, H4457.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 54 of chapter 13 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first sentence, and inserting in place 
thereof the following sentence:- There shall be a board of registration of real estate brokers and 
salesmen, in this section and in sections fifty-five to fifty-seven, inclusive, called the board, to be 
appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the council, consisting of seven 
members, citizens of the commonwealth, four of whom shall have been actively engaged in the 
real estate business as a full-time occupation for at least seven years prior to their appointment 
and who shall be licensed real estate brokers, one of whom shall either be an expert in fair 
housing and civil rights or a tenant from a duly recognized tenants’ organization in the 
commonwealth receiving public assistance from a local, state or federal rental voucher program, 
and two of whom shall be representatives of the public.   
SECTION 2. Section 55 of said chapter 13, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding 
at the end thereof the following paragraph:-   

of 4 14  The board shall publish, not less than quarterly, an account of newly licensed members. 
The board shall also publish, not less than quarterly, a summary of complaints filed against 
licensed members, the actions taken by the board to investigate such complaints, disciplinary 
hearings, disciplinary actions or revocations of licenses, the reason for such actions by the board, 
including any findings, in which finding has become final, of discrimination against any classes 
protected by chapter one hundred and fifty-one B or otherwise protected by any other general or 
special law or federal statute, and the name of the affected license holder.   
SECTION 3. Section 87AAA of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by striking out the third sentence, and inserting in place thereof the following:- 
The board shall, after notice by the Massachusetts commission against discrimination, or any 
other agency that administers fair housing laws and is certified by the federal Assistant Secretary 
for Fair Housing and Equal Opportunity pursuant to the federal Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C. 
3601 through 42 U.S.C. 3619, inclusive, that said commission or agency has made a finding, 
which finding has become final, that a licensed broker or salesman committed an unlawful 
practice in violation of chapter one hundred and fifty-one B arising out of or in the course of his 
occupation as a licensed broker or salesman, shall suspend forthwith the license of said broker or 
salesman for a period of sixty days, and, if the said commission or agency finds that said 
violation by such licensed broker or salesman occurred within two years of the date of a prior 
violation of said chapter one hundred and fifty-one B, which finding has been final, it shall so 
notify the board, and the board shall forthwith suspend the license of such broker or salesman for 
a period of one hundred and eighty days. The board, after notice by the office of the attorney 
general that a court in a matter brought by said office has made a finding, which finding has 
become final, that a licensed broker or salesman committed an unlawful practice in violation of 

of 4 37 chapter one hundred and fifty-one B arising out of or in the course of his occupation as a licensed 
broker or salesman, shall suspend forthwith the license of said broker or salesman for a period of 
sixty days, provided, however that if the board determines that the violation by such licensed 
broker or salesman occurred within two years of the date of a prior finding by a court or agency 
of a violation of chapter one hundred and fifty-one B, which prior finding has become final, it 
shall forthwith suspend the license of such broker or salesman for a period of one hundred and 
eighty days. The board shall suspend the license of a broker or salesman for any violation of 
chapter one hundred and fifty-one B referred to it under this section. Commissions and agencies 
empowered to make referrals to the board under this section shall make all referrals that qualify 
under this section and shall not have discretion as to whether to make the referral.   
SECTION 4. Section 87SS of said chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in place thereof the following 
sentence:-    
Every individual applicant for a license as a salesman who is required to take an 
examination therefore shall, as a prerequisite to taking such examination, submit proof 
satisfactory to the board that he has completed courses in real estate subjects approved by the 
board, such courses to total 40 classroom hours of instruction and must include at least 4 hours 
on fair housing law or diversity and inclusion in real estate; provided, however, that applicants 
having successfully completed a course in real property while enrolled in an accredited law 
school in the commonwealth may also take such examination.    

of 4 57  SECTION 5. Section 87XX 1/2 of said chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing, 
is hereby amended by striking out the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following 
paragraph:-    
Section 87XX1/2. Any person holding a license as a real estate broker or salesman shall, 
within their renewal period, satisfactorily complete courses or programs of instruction approved 
by the board; provided that attendance at such courses or programs of instruction shall be no less 
than six hours but no more than twelve hours as determined by the board. The curriculum 
contained in such courses or programs shall contain at least six hours of instruction concerning 
or related to compliance with laws and regulations, including at least two hours on fair housing 
or diversity and inclusion in real estate, and four hours selected from any of the following 
subjects: equal employment opportunity; accessibility for the disabled; agency law; 
environmental issues in real estate; zoning and building codes; real estate appraisal and 
financing; property tax assessments and valuation; and real estate board regulations. The board 
shall certify in advance the curriculum forming the basis of such courses or programs which 
satisfy the provisions of this section.